Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
Subchapter 9
— Licensing of Operators of Solid Waste Management Facilities

Cross References.

Agricultural operations, § 8-6-509.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19. Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-901. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“License” means a certificate of competency issued by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality to solid waste management facility operators who have met the requirements of the licensing program;

“Licensing committee” means the committee of solid waste management facility managers, operators, or technicians established in this subchapter to assist and advise the commission and the division in the examining and licensing of operators of solid waste management facilities;

“Operator” means any person who performs operation of a solid waste management facility requiring individual judgment which may directly affect the proper operation of the solid waste management facility.

“Operator” does not include an official solely exercising general administrative supervision;

“Operator-in-training” means an employee of a solid waste management facility who has been issued an apprenticeship license by the director;

“Provisional certificate” means a document issued to an operator by the director allowing an individual to operate at a facility while working to fulfill the licensing requirements;

“Recovered materials” means:

Metal;

Paper;

Glass;

Plastic;

Textiles;

Yard trimmings not destined for composting; or

Rubber materials which are not waste tires or waste tire residuals,

“Recovered materials” are not solid waste;

“Sanitary landfill” means any place for which a permit for disposal of solid waste on land is required under the provisions of this chapter;

“Solid waste disposal facility” means any place at which solid waste is dumped, abandoned, accepted, or disposed of for final disposition by incineration, landfilling, composting, or other method.

Wastewater treatment plants permitted under the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System and units at hazardous waste management facilities permitted under the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., and the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Code shall not be deemed to be disposal sites or facilities for the purpose of this subchapter; and

“Solid waste management facility” means all contiguous land and structures, other appurtenances, and improvements on the land used for storage, collection, transportation, processing, treatment, or disposal of solid waste.

For purposes of this subchapter, facilities engaged solely in the recycling of source-separated materials are excluded.

Also excluded are processes, operations, and facilities that are regulated pursuant to hazardous waste rules and regulations which are not regulated pursuant to solid waste rules and regulations.

that have known recycling potential, can be feasibly recycled, and have been diverted and source-separated or have been removed from the solid waste stream for sale, use, or reuse as raw materials, whether or not the materials require subsequent processing or separation from each other but do not include materials destined for any use that constitutes disposal.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 1997, No. 1207, § 3; 1997, No. 1254, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 75; 2005, No. 728, § 1; 2009, No. 1199, § 9; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2659-2662; 2019, No. 1067, §§ 8, 9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided: “(a) The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2660, amended former subdivision (4) of this section to replace “department” with “Division of Environmental Quality”. However, Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 8, specifically repealed this subdivision.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “or” for “and/or” in (13)(A), and substituted “and” for “and/or” in (13)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (2) and (3); substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in (4); substituted “Director of the Division of Environmental Quality” for “director” in (5); and substituted “division” for “department” in (6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1067 repealed (4); and deleted “and illegal dumps control officers” following “operators” in (5).

8-6-902. Penalties — Procedures.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter or of any rule or order issued pursuant thereto, shall be subject to the same penalty and enforcement provisions as are contained in the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the procedure of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of rules, conduct of hearings, notice, power of subpoena, review of action on permits, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106 and 8-4-201 — 8-4-230 of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., including, without limitation, §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-210, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229.

All rules adopted under this subchapter shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 1997, No. 179, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 559.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b) and (c).

8-6-903. Licenses required.

It shall be illegal for any county, municipality, governmental subdivision, public or private corporation, or other person to operate a solid waste management facility unless the competency of the operator is duly licensed by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality under the provisions of this subchapter.

It shall further be illegal for any person to perform the duties of an operator of any such solid waste management facility without being duly licensed under this subchapter.

With the advice and assistance of the licensing committee, the director may grant a written waiver from the requirements of this subchapter.

The director may withdraw a written waiver under subdivision (c)(1) of this section for just cause by written notice to the county, municipality, governmental subdivision, public or private corporation, or other person to whom the written waiver was granted.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 2015, No. 937, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2663.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-6-904. Licensing committee — Members — Compensation — Restrictions.

There is created a licensing committee to advise and assist the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Division of Environmental Quality in the administration of the licensing program.

The committee shall be composed of ten (10) voting members as follows:

Three (3) members, to be appointed by the commission, shall be solid waste management facility operators licensed by the division;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be an employee of a county operating a solid waste management facility who holds the position of solid waste management facility on-site operator or supervisor;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be an employee of a municipality operating a sanitary landfill who holds the position of landfill on-site operator or supervisor;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be a representative of one (1) of the duly constituted regional solid waste management boards;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be an on-site operator or supervisor of a waste tire processing facility;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be an on-site operator or supervisor of a nonsegregated materials recovery, transfer, or composting facility;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be a faculty member of or other qualified person associated with an accredited college, university, or professional school in this state whose major field is related to environmental education; and

One (1) member, to be appointed by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, shall be a qualified member of his or her staff who shall serve ex officio with no vote as executive secretary of the committee.

In the event of a vacancy, a new member shall be appointed by the commission to serve out the unexpired term.

As of August 12, 2006, no nonstate agency member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive three-year terms.

Those members serving unexpired five-year terms may serve an additional one (1) consecutive three-year term.

The committee shall select a member to serve as chair each year and shall meet as necessary to carry out its duties under this subchapter and at the call of the chair.

State agency members of the committee shall receive no additional salary or per diem for their services as members of the committee, but they shall be allowed their travel and maintenance expenses while attending meetings away from Little Rock.

No member of the committee shall participate in any licensing decision involving the firm or organization by which that member is employed or in which that member has a direct or indirect financial interest.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 47; 1997, No. 1254, § 2; 1999, No. 1508, § 7(c); 2005, No. 728, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2664-2666.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (a)(2)(H); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2)(A).

8-6-905. Powers and duties.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, with the advice and assistance of the licensing committee, is given and charged with the power and duty to adopt rules implementing and effectuating such powers and duties of the Division of Environmental Quality and the committee under this subchapter as may be necessary for the administration and enforcement of this subchapter.

The division is charged with the responsibility of administering and enforcing this subchapter, with the advice and assistance of the committee, and is given and charged with the following powers and duties:

To conduct examinations for licensing, which shall be held at least annually and more frequently as the commission shall deem necessary.

This duty may be delegated by the division to the administrator of any approved course;

To issue licenses to qualified solid waste management facility operators, to renew those licenses, to suspend or revoke the licenses for cause after due notice and opportunity for hearing, to issue one-year apprenticeship licenses to operators-in-training, and to issue provisional certificates; and

To initiate enforcement actions or institute court proceedings, or both, to compel compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and rules issued under this subchapter.

The committee shall:

Conduct inquiries and establish findings necessary to advise the commission and the division on irregularities encountered in the management of the licensing program;

Conduct inquiries and establish facts necessary to advise the commission and the division on the actions of licensees; and

Recommend administrative sanctions, including, but not limited to, the suspension and revocation of licenses as necessary to promote the professional integrity of solid waste licensees.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 1997, No. 1207, § 4; 1997, No. 1254, § 3; 2005, No. 728, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 560, 561; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2667-2670; 2019, No. 1067, § 10.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1207, § 6, codified as § 8-6-510, provided: “None of the provisions of this act are intended to supersede any of the reuse, recycling or fill provisions of state law or Regulation 22 of the Solid Waste Management Division of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology.”

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided: “(a) The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1067 deleted “and qualified illegal dumps control officers” following “operators” in (b)(2).

8-6-906. Classification of licenses.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall classify solid waste management facility operator licenses, taking into account the type and complexity of the solid waste management facility, the character and volume of waste managed, the skill, knowledge, and experience reasonably required to successfully operate the solid waste management facility, and such other factors as the commission shall deem appropriate.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, with the advice and assistance of the licensing committee, shall license persons according to their qualifications to successfully operate solid waste management facilities within the classifications established and effectuated by rules promulgated by the commission.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 562; 2019, No. 910, § 2671.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

8-6-907. Licensing.

All operators in responsible charge of public and private solid waste management facilities shall be duly licensed and certified as competent by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality under the provisions of this subchapter and under such rules as the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt, with the advice and assistance of the licensing committee, pursuant to the authority of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 563; 2019, No. 910, § 2672.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-908. Licensing — Eligibility — Reciprocity.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall license and certify all applicants for licenses under this subchapter who satisfy the requirements of this subchapter and the rules issued pursuant thereto.

Licenses shall be granted according to the classifications of operator licenses established in the rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

Licenses shall be valid for a period of one (1) year and, with the exception of the apprenticeship license, shall be renewable upon application if the applicant meets the renewal requirements established by commission rule. Provisional certificates shall be for a period of one (1) year, but may be extended if the director determines there is sufficient justification.

All operators of solid waste management facilities within the state shall apply to the Division of Environmental Quality for a license.

The director may, at his or her discretion, waive the requirements or any part of the requirements for formal examination of an applicant for a license if the applicant holds a valid license or certificate from another state in which the requirements for a license in the appropriate classification are at least equal to the requirements set forth in this subchapter and the rules issued pursuant thereto.

The director shall issue an apprenticeship license to operators-in-training as established under this subchapter and in rules promulgated by the commission.

The director may issue, at his or her discretion, a provisional certificate to any operator for just cause as established under this subchapter and in rules promulgated by the commission.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 1997, No. 1254, § 4; 2019, No. 315, §§ 564, 565; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2673, 2674.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules in (a)(1) and (a)(2), (c), (d), and (e); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (b).

8-6-909. Fees.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the authority to set fees in an amount to cover the cost of the administration of this subchapter. These fees to be assessed per classification of certification shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for the initial cost of examination and license, fifty dollars ($50.00) for the cost of reciprocity review and license, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for annual license renewal, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for provisional certificates, and a ten-dollar penalty for late renewal.

All of the fees shall be deposited into the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund, as established in § 8-1-105.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 750, § 1; 1995, No. 165, § 1; 1995, No. 193, § 1; 1997, No. 1254, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 76; 2019, No. 910, § 2675.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

Subchapter 10
— Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1127, § 1 provided: “The Arkansas General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1)

Arkansas Act 747 of 1991 (codified at Ark. Code Ann. § 8-6-1001 et seq. (Supp. 1991)) created the ‘Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund’ and imposed additional landfill disposal fees for that purpose.

“(2)

Arkansas Act 754 of 1991 (codified at Ark. Code Ann. § 8-6-606 (Supp. 1991)) amended Ark. Code Ann. § 8-6-606 to increase the landfill disposal fees under the Solid Waste Management Recycling Fund Act. The landfill disposal fees under the Solid Waste Management Recycling Fund had previously been established by Arkansas Act 849 of 1989 and Arkansas Act 934 of 1989.

“(3)

The General Assembly has learned that in many areas of the state, residents and businesses are having their solid waste transported to and disposed of at landfill disposal sites in other states. By doing so, these residents and businesses are avoiding paying their share of taxes referenced above, as would ordinarily be passed on to the solid waste generator. By such transportation and disposal of solid waste in other states, this state is losing much needed revenues. Further, by requiring the payment of such fees on solid wastes disposed of within the state, but not on solid wastes generated within this state and transported to and disposed of in other states, the existing fee structure under the above-referenced law unfairly burdens landfill disposal entities within the state since they are required to pay said fees causing them to charge higher rates than their out of state competitors which do not have to pay such fees.

“(4)

In order to remedy the present situation, it is the finding of the Arkansas General Assembly that similar fees need to be assessed on all solid waste transported in Arkansas but disposed of outside the state. By doing so, the avoidance of landfill disposal fees by the transfer of solid waste out of state will be remedied and the current unfair burden on in-state landfill disposal entities will be alleviated.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 1127, § 7: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some areas of the state are facing critical shortages of solid waste disposal capacity due to the difficulties in siting landfill facilities at the local level. It is found that the authority granted to municipalities and counties to adopt more restrictive standards for the location, design, construction, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities than those adopted by the federal, state and regional laws, rules, regulations, and orders, has exacerbated and attenuated this crises and could thwart or jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 938, § 9: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year begins on July 1, and that this emergency clause is necessary in order that uniformity can be achieved at the beginning of the 1997-1998 fiscal year for money deposited into the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund and the moneys allocated from that fund for the Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 1210, § 10: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2015, No. 1037, § 2: Apr. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that funds from the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund will alleviate problems in waste tire facility closures due to lack of funds; and that this act is immediately necessary because delays in waste tire facility closure pose a danger to the public health and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1001. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Landfill” means a landfill permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., except a landfill where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character;

“Permittee” means any person holding a solid waste disposal permit as provided in the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.;

“Post-closure corrective action” means any measures deemed necessary by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality to prevent or abate contamination of the environment from any landfill which has been certified as properly closed by the Division of Environmental Quality;

“Solid waste” means any garbage or refuse, sludge from a wastewater treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility, and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permit under 33 U.S.C. § 1342 or source material, special nuclear material, or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, Pub. L. No. 83-703;

“Solid waste disposal permit” means a permit issued by the State of Arkansas under the provisions of the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., for the construction and operation of a landfill waste disposal facility; and

“Transporter” or “solid waste transporter” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, local solid waste authority, institution, county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or other legal entity transporting solid waste within the state that is to be disposed of outside of the state.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 747, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 2; 1995, No. 511, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 77; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2676, 2677.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2) and (3); and, in (6), substituted “Director of the Division of Environmental Quality” for “director” and “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

U.S. Code.

The Atomic Energy Act of 1954, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.

8-6-1002. Creation.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to be known as the “Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund”.

In addition to all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund, there shall be deposited into the fund all landfill disposal fees collected pursuant to this subchapter and any moneys received by the state as a gift or donation to the fund or any federal moneys designated to enter the fund and all interest earned upon moneys deposited into the fund.

Moneys received into the fund may also be used by the Division of Environmental Quality for administrative purposes at a level not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) annually with an annual escalator not to exceed three percent (3%).

The fund shall be administered by the division, which shall authorize funding and administrative expenditures from the fund according to the provisions of this subchapter.

The fund shall be administered by the division and shall be used by the division for landfill post-closure corrective action.

The fund shall be used only if the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality determines that:

A landfill which is no longer receiving waste, regardless of when it ceased operating, is causing groundwater contamination or is causing other contamination that is a hazard to public health or endangers the environment; and

The owner or operator of the landfill site has expended at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) toward corrective action, unless the owner or operator cannot be located or the director determines an emergency exists necessitating immediate corrective action.

The fund shall be administered by the division and may be used by the division to complete all activities necessary for the closure of a permitted waste tire processing or disposal site that is owned or operated by a regional solid waste management district if the division determines that the district lacks sufficient funds to complete closure of the permitted waste tire processing or disposal site.

The fund shall not be used to compensate third parties for damages to property caused by the contamination.

For the purposes of this subchapter only, closed areas or operational phases contiguous to any permitted landfill which is receiving solid waste when the director determines that corrective action is necessary are not eligible for funding as contemplated by this subchapter.

An owner or operator of a permitted landfill shall establish and at all times maintain financial assurance for the post-closure maintenance of the landfill. At a minimum, each owner or operator shall provide no less than twenty percent (20%) of estimated post-closure maintenance costs through a financial mechanism readily negotiable by the division to cash funds, for example, a letter of credit, surety bond, irrevocable trust, insurance, or other mechanism approved by the division, upon default by the owner and operator of post-closure obligations.

If, after proper closure of a landfill, the division reasonably determines that the owner or operator cannot be located or cannot otherwise satisfy, in whole or part, post-closure maintenance obligations, the division is authorized to expend the necessary funds from the fund to satisfy the requirements of state and federal law and to prevent or abate releases to the environment.

If the division is required to expend funds from the fund due to the failure of an owner or operator to meet the requirements of this subsection, the division shall pursue collection and recovery of the funds by issuing an administrative order notifying the owner or operator by certified mail at the last known address of the owner or operator of the action taken by the division and the amount of funds expended from the fund and that the administrative order may be appealed in accordance with the division's rules.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 747, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 2; 1995, No. 511, § 4; 1997, No. 938, §§ 2, 3; 1999, No. 1210, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 18; 2015, No. 1037, § 1; 2017, No. 624, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 566; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2678-2680.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (b)(3).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a)(3)(A) as (a)(3) and deleted (a)(3)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(3) and the introductory language of (b)(2)(B); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund, §
19-5-979.

8-6-1003. Landfill disposal fees.

In addition to any other fee provided by law, there is imposed on each landfill permittee a landfill disposal fee of fifteen cents (15¢) for each uncompacted cubic yard of solid waste and thirty cents (30¢) for each compacted cubic yard of solid waste received at the landfill.

If a landfill permittee is required or chooses to operate on a weight basis, the landfill disposal fee shall be one dollar ($1.00) for each one (1) ton (2,000 lbs.) of solid waste received at the landfill.

The landfill permittee referenced in subsection (a) of this section shall use the weight basis in determining the fee for the disposal or transportation of ash.

Solid waste collected during the annual Keep Arkansas Beautiful and Keep America Beautiful campaigns that are sponsored by the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Commission is exempt from the landfill disposal fee under this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 747, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 2; 1997, No. 374, § 1; 2001, No. 217, § 3; 2009, No. 189, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (c).

8-6-1004. Collection of fees.

Fees imposed pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall be collected as follows:

Each landfill permittee and each solid waste transporter shall submit to the Division of Environmental Quality on or before January 15, April 15, July 15, and October 15 of each year a quarterly report which accurately states the total weight or volume of solid waste received at the landfill or transported out of state during the previous quarter;

On or before January 15, April 15, July 15, and October 15 of each year, each landfill permittee and solid waste transporter shall pay to the division the full amount of such disposal fees due for the previous quarter; and

The disposal and transportation fees collected pursuant to this section shall be special revenues and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 747, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 2; 1995, No. 511, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2681.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (2).